fst/nom_stems.lexc
! N75b — 38 entries
LEXICON N75b_stems
  augrābtun+N+Sg+Nom:augrābtun  # ;
  auwērbtun+N+Sg+Nom:auwērbtun  # ;
  auwērptun+N+Sg+Nom:auwērptun  # ;
  dēlbtun+N+Sg+Nom:dēlbtun  # ;
  endēlbtun+N+Sg+Nom:endēlbtun  # ;
  enkāuptun+N+Sg+Nom:enkāuptun  # ;
  enskēiptun+N+Sg+Nom:enskēiptun  # ;
  enwērbtun+N+Sg+Nom:enwērbtun  # ;
  ertrēmptun+N+Sg+Nom:ertrēmptun  # ;
  etwērbtun+N+Sg+Nom:etwērbtun  # ;
  etwērptun+N+Sg+Nom:etwērptun  # ;
  etwērptun+N+Sg+Nom:etwērptun  # ;
  glābtun+N+Sg+Nom:glābtun  # ;
  preiglābtun+N+Sg+Nom:preiglābtun  # ;
  glāubtun+N+Sg+Nom:glāubtun  # ;
  izglāubtun+N+Sg+Nom:izglāubtun  # ;
  grābtun+N+Sg+Nom:grābtun  # ;
  izgrābtun+N+Sg+Nom:izgrābtun  # ;
  izknēiptun+N+Sg+Nom:izknēiptun  # ;
  izkāuptun+N+Sg+Nom:izkāuptun  # ;
  izsuptun+N+Sg+Nom:izsuptun  # ;
  izwērbtun+N+Sg+Nom:izwērbtun  # ;
  izwērptun+N+Sg+Nom:izwērptun  # ;
  knēiptun+N+Sg+Nom:knēiptun  # ;
  kāuptun+N+Sg+Nom:kāuptun  # ;
  pawērptun+N+Sg+Nom:pawērptun  # ;
  perrēptun+N+Sg+Nom:perrēptun  # ;
  perwērbtun+N+Sg+Nom:perwērbtun  # ;
  preigērbtwei+N+Sg+Nom:preigērbtwei  # ;
  preiwērbtun+N+Sg+Nom:preiwērbtun  # ;
  preiwērptun+N+Sg+Nom:preiwērptun  # ;
  rēptwei+N+Sg+Nom:rēptwei  # ;
  serēptun+N+Sg+Nom:serēptun  # ;
  skēiptun+N+Sg+Nom:skēiptun  # ;
  suptun+N+Sg+Nom:suptun  # ;
  trēmptun+N+Sg+Nom:trēmptun  # ;
  wērbtun+N+Sg+Nom:wērbtun  # ;
  wērptun+N+Sg+Nom:wērptun  # ;

! N81b — 8 entries
LEXICON N81b_stems
  aulemtun+N+Sg+Nom:aulemtun  # ;
  aulemtun+N+Sg+Nom:aulemtun  # ;
  drebtun+N+Sg+Nom:drebtun  # ;
  gremtun+N+Sg+Nom:gremtun  # ;
  izlemtun+N+Sg+Nom:izlemtun  # ;
  lemtun+N+Sg+Nom:lemtun  # ;
  perlemtun+N+Sg+Nom:perlemtun  # ;
  wemtwei+N+Sg+Nom:wemtwei  # ;

! N81c — 4 entries
LEXICON N81c_stems
  dwestwei+N+Sg+Nom:dwestwei  # ;
  nadwestwei+N+Sg+Nom:nadwestwei  # ;
  endwestun+N+Sg+Nom:endwestun  # ;
  izdwestun+N+Sg+Nom:izdwestun  # ;

! N81a — 2 entries
LEXICON N81a_stems
  enweltun+N+Sg+Nom:enweltun  # ;
  weltun+N+Sg+Nom:weltun  # ;

! N75a — 1 entries
LEXICON N75a_stems
  gultwei+N+Sg+Nom:gultwei  # ;

! N106d — 2 entries
LEXICON N106d_stems
  perleītun+N+Sg+Nom:perleītun  # ;
  perleītun+N+Pl+Nom:perleītun  # ;
  perleītun+N+Sg+Gen:perleītun  # ;
  perleītun+N+Pl+Gen:perleītun  # ;
  perleītun+N+Sg+Dat:perleītun  # ;
  perleītun+N+Pl+Dat:perleītun  # ;
  perleītun+N+Sg+Akk:perleītun  # ;
  perleītun+N+Pl+Akk:perleītun  # ;
  senlaītun+N+Sg+Nom:senlaītun  # ;
  senlaītun+N+Pl+Nom:senlaītun  # ;
  senlaītun+N+Sg+Gen:senlaītun  # ;
  senlaītun+N+Pl+Gen:senlaītun  # ;
  senlaītun+N+Sg+Dat:senlaītun  # ;
  senlaītun+N+Pl+Dat:senlaītun  # ;
  senlaītun+N+Sg+Akk:senlaītun  # ;
  senlaītun+N+Pl+Akk:senlaītun  # ;

! N102a — 1 entries
LEXICON N102a_stems
  listun+N+Sg+Nom:listun  # ;

! N0n — 2 entries
LEXICON N0n_stems
  menjū+N+Sg+Nom:menjū  # ;
  menjū+N+Pl+Nom:menjū  # ;
  menjū+N+Sg+Gen:menjū  # ;
  menjū+N+Pl+Gen:menjū  # ;
  menjū+N+Sg+Dat:menjū  # ;
  menjū+N+Pl+Dat:menjū  # ;
  menjū+N+Sg+Akk:menjū  # ;
  menjū+N+Pl+Akk:menjū  # ;
  ālibi+N+Sg+Nom:ālibi  # ;
  ālibi+N+Pl+Nom:ālibi  # ;
  ālibi+N+Sg+Gen:ālibi  # ;
  ālibi+N+Pl+Gen:ālibi  # ;
  ālibi+N+Sg+Dat:ālibi  # ;
  ālibi+N+Pl+Dat:ālibi  # ;
  ālibi+N+Sg+Akk:ālibi  # ;
  ālibi+N+Pl+Akk:ālibi  # ;

! N106b — 1 entries
LEXICON N106b_stems
  meītwei+N+Sg+Nom:meītwei  # ;

! N137a — 1 entries
LEXICON N137a_stems
  mīlītun+N+Sg+Nom:mīlītun  # ;

! N82a — 1 entries
LEXICON N82a_stems
  piltwei+N+Sg+Nom:piltwei  # ;

! N97a — 2 entries
LEXICON N97a_stems
  swiltun+N+Sg+Nom:swiltun  # ;
  swiltwei+N+Sg+Nom:swiltwei  # ;
